Nebraska, session 109, LB350.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-1823, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-1823 (1) If at any time prior to or during trial it appears that
the defendant has become mentally incompetent to stand trial, such
disability may be called to the attention of the district or county court
by the county attorney or city attorney, by the defendant, or by any
person for the defendant. The judge of the district or county court of
the county where the defendant is to be tried shall have the authority to
determine whether or not the defendant is competent to stand trial. The
judge may also cause such medical, psychiatric, or psychological
examination of the defendant to be made as he or she deems warranted and
hold such hearing as he or she deems necessary. The cost of the
examination, when ordered by the court, shall be the expense of the
county in which the crime is charged. The judge may allow any physician,
psychiatrist, or psychologist a reasonable fee for his or her services,
which amount, when determined by the judge, shall be certified to the
county board which shall cause payment to be made. Should the judge
determine after a hearing that the defendant is mentally incompetent to
stand trial and that there is a substantial probability that the
defendant will become competent within the reasonably foreseeable future,
the judge shall order the defendant to be committed to the Department of
Health and Human Services to provide appropriate treatment to restore
competency. This may include commitment to a state hospital for the
mentally ill, another appropriate state-owned or state-operated facility,
or a contract facility or provider pursuant to an alternative treatment
plan proposed by the department and approved by the court under
subsection (2) of this section until such time as the disability may be
removed.
(2) (2)(a) If the department determines that treatment by a contract
facility or provider is appropriate, the department shall file a report
outlining its determination and such alternative treatment plan with the
-2-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
court. Within five twenty-one days after the filing of such report, the
court shall hold a hearing to determine whether such treatment is
appropriate. The court may approve or deny such alternative treatment
plan.
(b) A defendant shall not be eligible for treatment by a contract
facility or provider under this subsection if the judge determines that
the public's safety would be at risk.
(3) Within five sixty days after entry of the order committing the
defendant to the department, and every sixty days thereafter until either
the disability is removed or other disposition of the defendant has been
made, the court shall hold a hearing to determine (a) whether the
defendant is competent to stand trial or (b) whether or not there is a
substantial probability that the defendant will become competent within
the reasonably foreseeable future.
(4) If it is determined that there is not a substantial probability
that the defendant will become competent within the reasonably
foreseeable future, then the state shall either (a) commence the
applicable civil commitment proceeding that would be required to commit
any other person for an indefinite period of time or (b) release the
defendant. If during the period of time between the sixty-day review
hearings set forth in subsection (3) of this section it is the opinion of
the department that the defendant is competent to stand trial, the
department shall file a report outlining its opinion with the court and
within seven days after such report being filed the court shall hold a
hearing to determine whether or not the defendant is competent to stand
trial. The state shall pay the cost of maintenance and care of the
defendant during the period of time ordered by the court for treatment to
remove the disability.
(5) The defendant, by and through counsel, may move to be discharged
from the offenses charged in the complaint or information for the reason
that there is not a substantial probability that the defendant will
-3-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
become competent within the reasonably foreseeable future.
(6) In determining whether there is a substantial probability that a
defendant will become competent in the reasonably foreseeable future, the
court shall take into consideration the likely length of any sentence
that would be imposed upon the defendant. If the court discharges the
defendant, the court shall state whether such discharge is with or
without prejudice.
(7)(a) If a judge orders a defendant to be committed to the
Department of Health and Human Services to receive treatment to restore
competency and such defendant remains lodged in the county jail, the
department shall reimburse the county for lodging the defendant.
(b) Costs of lodging the defendant shall include the daily rate of
lodging the defendant, food, medical services, transportation, and any
other necessary costs incurred by the county to lodge the defendant.
(c) The daily rate of lodging the defendant shall be one hundred
dollars per day for each day or portion thereof after the first thirty
days that the defendant is lodged in the county jail after a
determination by a judge that the defendant is required to be restored to
competency. On July 1, 2023, and each July 1 thereafter, the department
shall adjust the amount to be reimbursed to the county jails by an amount
equal to the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers, as published by the United States Department of
Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the twelve months ending on June
30 of such year.
(d) For purposes of this section, medical services has the same
meaning as provided in subsection (2) of section 47-701.
Sec. 2. Section 71-919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-919 (1)(a) A law enforcement officer may take a person into
emergency protective custody, cause him or her to be taken into emergency
protective custody, or continue his or her custody if he or she is
-4-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
already in custody if the officer has probable cause to believe:
(i) Such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex
offender and that the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1)
of section 83-174.01 is likely to occur before mental health board
proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex
Offender Commitment Act may be initiated to obtain custody of the person;
or
(ii) For a person domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, that
such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
under tribal law and that harm comparable to that described in section
71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 or the equivalent under
tribal law is likely to occur before mental health proceedings under
tribal law may be initiated to obtain custody of the person.
(b) Such person shall be admitted to an appropriate and available
medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section,
each county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such county in such
facilities.
(ii) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for
whom emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the
tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for
payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from
such tribe in such facilities.
(d) A mental health professional who has probable cause to believe
that a person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
may cause such person to be taken into custody and shall have a limited
privilege to hold such person until a law enforcement officer or other
-5-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
authorized person arrives to take custody of such person.
(2)(a) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section shall be admitted to an appropriate and available medical
facility unless such person has a prior conviction for a sex offense
listed in section 29-4003.
(b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who has a prior conviction for a sex offense listed in section
29-4003 shall be admitted to a jail or Department of Correctional
Services facility unless a medical or psychiatric emergency exists for
which treatment at a medical facility is required. The person in
emergency protective custody shall remain at the medical facility until
the medical or psychiatric emergency has passed and it is safe to
transport such person, at which time the person shall be transferred to
an available jail or Department of Correctional Services facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section,
upon admission to a facility of a person taken into emergency protective
custody by a law enforcement officer under this section, such officer
shall execute a written certificate prescribed and provided by the
Department of Health and Human Services. The certificate shall allege the
officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and dangerous
or a dangerous sex offender and shall contain a summary of the person's
behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such certificate shall be
immediately forwarded to the county attorney, who shall file it with the
court.
(b) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, upon admission to a facility, such officer shall
execute written documentation in a format provided by the tribe. At a
minimum, such documentation shall clearly identify the subject, identify
the relevant tribe, allege the officer's belief that the person in
custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender under
-6-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
tribal law, and contain a summary of the subject's behavior supporting
such allegations. A copy of such documentation shall be immediately
forwarded to the appropriate tribal prosecutor or tribal official, who
shall file it with the tribal court or appropriate tribal official.
(4) The administrator of the facility shall have such person
evaluated by a mental health professional as soon as reasonably possible
but not later than thirty-six hours after admission. The mental health
professional shall not be the mental health professional who causes such
person to be taken into custody under this section and shall not be a
member or alternate member of the mental health board that will preside
over any hearing under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the
Sex Offender Commitment Act with respect to such person. A person shall
be released from emergency protective custody after completion of such
evaluation unless the mental health professional determines, in his or
her clinical opinion, that such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a
dangerous sex offender. In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian
country who is taken into emergency protective custody under tribal law,
the mental health professional shall notify an appropriate tribal
prosecutor or official of such release.
Sec. 3. Section 71-931, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-931 (1) Any treatment order entered by a mental health board
under section 71-925 shall include directions for (a) the preparation and
implementation of an individualized treatment plan for the subject and
(b) documentation and reporting of the subject's progress under such
plan.
(2) The individualized treatment plan shall contain a statement of
(a) the nature of the subject's mental illness or substance dependence,
(b) the least restrictive treatment alternative consistent with the
clinical diagnosis of the subject, and (c) intermediate and long-term
treatment goals for the subject and a projected timetable for the
-7-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
attainment of such goals.
(3) A copy of the individualized treatment plan shall be filed with
the mental health board for review and inclusion in the subject's file
and served upon the county attorney, the subject, the subject's counsel,
and the subject's legal guardian or conservator, if any, within five
working days after the entry of the board's order. The county attorney
shall file a copy with the court. Treatment shall be commenced within two
working days after preparation of the plan.
(4) The subject shall be entitled to know the contents of the
individualized treatment plan and what the subject must do in order to
meet the requirements of such plan.
(5) The subject shall be notified by the mental health board when
the mental health board has changed the treatment order or has ordered
the discharge of the subject from commitment.
Sec. 4. Section 71-932, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-932 The person or entity designated by the mental health board
under section 71-931 to prepare and oversee the subject's individualized
treatment plan shall submit periodic reports to the mental health board
of the subject's progress under such plan and any modifications to the
plan. The mental health board may distribute copies of such reports to
other interested parties as permitted by law. With respect to a subject
ordered by the mental health board to receive inpatient treatment, such
initial report shall be filed with the mental health board for review and
inclusion in the subject's file and served upon the county attorney, the
subject, the subject's counsel, and the subject's legal guardian or
conservator, if any, no later than ten days after submission of the
subject's individualized treatment plan. The county attorney shall file a
copy with the court. With respect to each subject committed by the mental
health board, such reports shall be so filed and served no less
frequently than every ninety days for a period of one year following
-8-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
submission of the subject's individualized treatment plan and every six
months thereafter.
Sec. 5. Section 71-933, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-933 (1) Any provider of outpatient treatment to a subject ordered
by a mental health board to receive such treatment shall report to the
board and to the county attorney if (a) the subject is not complying with
his or her individualized treatment plan, (b) the subject is not
following the conditions set by the mental health board, (c) the
treatment plan is not effective, or (d) there has been a significant
change in the subject's mental illness or substance dependence. Such
report may be transmitted by facsimile, but the original of the report
shall be mailed to the board and the county attorney no later than
twenty-four hours after the facsimile transmittal. The county attorney
shall file a copy with the court.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of such report, the county attorney shall have
the matter investigated to determine whether there is a factual basis for
the report.
(b) If the county attorney determines that there is no factual basis
for the report or that no further action is warranted, he or she shall
notify the board and the treatment provider and take no further action.
(c) If the county attorney determines that there is a factual basis
for the report and that intervention by the mental health board is
necessary to protect the subject or others, the county attorney may file
a motion for reconsideration of the conditions set forth by the board and
have the matter set for hearing.
(d) The county attorney may apply for a warrant to take immediate
custody of the subject pending a rehearing by the board under subdivision
(c) of this subsection if the county attorney has reasonable cause to
believe that the subject poses a threat of danger to himself or herself
or others prior to such rehearing. The application for a warrant shall be
-9-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
supported by affidavit or sworn testimony by the county attorney, a
mental health professional, or any other informed person. The application
for a warrant and the supporting affidavit may be filed with the board by
facsimile, but the original shall be filed with the board not later than
three days after the facsimile transmittal, excluding holidays and
weekends. Sworn testimony in support of the warrant application may be
taken over the telephone at the discretion of the board.
Sec. 6. Section 71-937, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-937 (1) A mental health board shall be notified in writing of the
release by the treatment facility of any individual committed by the
mental health board. Such notice shall immediately be forwarded to the
county attorney. The county attorney shall file a copy with the court.
The mental health board shall, upon the motion of the county attorney, or
may upon its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the
individual is mentally ill and dangerous and consequently not a proper
subject for release. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with
the procedures established for hearings under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act. The subject of such hearing shall be accorded all rights
guaranteed to the subject of a petition under the act.
(2) In the case of a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and
committed for treatment as provided in section 71-964, the tribal court
shall be notified in writing of the release by the treatment facility of
any such subject committed by the tribal court.
Sec. 7. Section 71-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1204 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mental health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for
emergency protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such
person is a dangerous sex offender shall execute a written certificate as
provided in subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four
-10-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate
shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney. The county
attorney shall file a copy with the court.
(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the
following information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel,
guardian or conservator, and next of kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other
care or treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge
of the subject's mental illness or personality disorder who may be called
as a witness at a mental health board hearing with respect to the
subject, if known;
(e) The name and address of the medical facility in which the
subject is being held for emergency protective custody and evaluation;
(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health
professional;
(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he
or she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for
emergency protective custody and evaluation; and
(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that,
in his or her clinical opinion, the subject is a dangerous sex offender
and the clinical basis for such opinion.
(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of
such person, determines that such person is a dangerous sex offender
shall execute appropriate written documentation in a format provided by
the tribe not later than twenty-four hours after the completion of such
evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to
-11-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
the person designated by the tribe.
Sec. 8. Section 71-1215, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1215 (1) Any treatment order entered by a mental health board
under section 71-1209 shall include directions for (a) the preparation
and implementation of an individualized treatment plan for the subject
and (b) documentation and reporting of the subject's progress under such
plan.
(2) The individualized treatment plan shall contain a statement of
(a) the nature of the subject's mental illness or personality disorder,
(b) the least restrictive treatment alternative consistent with the
clinical diagnosis of the subject, and (c) intermediate and long-term
treatment goals for the subject and a projected timetable for the
attainment of such goals.
(3) A copy of the individualized treatment plan shall be filed with
the mental health board for review and inclusion in the subject's file
and served upon the county attorney, the subject, the subject's counsel,
and the subject's legal guardian or conservator, if any, within five
working days after the entry of the board's order. The county attorney
shall file a copy with the court. Treatment shall be commenced within two
working days after preparation of the plan.
(4) The subject shall be entitled to know the contents of the
individualized treatment plan and what the subject must do in order to
meet the requirements of such plan.
(5) The subject shall be notified by the mental health board when
the mental health board has changed the treatment order or has ordered
the discharge of the subject from commitment.
Sec. 9. Section 71-1216, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1216 The person or entity designated by the mental health board
under section 71-1215 to prepare and oversee the subject's individualized
-12-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
treatment plan shall submit periodic reports to the mental health board
of the subject's progress under such plan and any modifications to the
plan. The mental health board may distribute copies of such reports to
other interested parties as permitted by law. With respect to a subject
ordered by the mental health board to receive inpatient treatment, such
initial report shall be filed with the mental health board for review and
inclusion in the subject's file and served upon the county attorney, the
subject, the subject's counsel, and the subject's legal guardian or
conservator, if any, no later than ten days after submission of the
subject's individualized treatment plan. The county attorney shall file a
copy with the court. With respect to each subject committed by the mental
health board, such reports shall be so filed and served no less
frequently than every ninety days for a period of one year following
submission of the subject's individualized treatment plan and every six
months thereafter.
Sec. 10. Section 71-1217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1217 (1) Any provider of outpatient treatment to a subject
ordered by a mental health board to receive such treatment shall report
to the board and to the county attorney if (a) the subject is not
complying with his or her individualized treatment plan, (b) the subject
is not following the conditions set by the mental health board, (c) the
treatment plan is not effective, or (d) there has been a significant
change in the subject's mental illness or personality disorder or the
level of risk posed to the public. Such report may be transmitted by
facsimile, but the original of the report shall be mailed to the board
and the county attorney no later than twenty-four hours after the
facsimile transmittal. The county attorney shall file a copy with the
court.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of such report, the county attorney shall have
the matter investigated to determine whether there is a factual basis for
-13-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
the report.
(b) If the county attorney determines that there is no factual basis
for the report or that no further action is warranted, he or she shall
notify the board and the treatment provider and take no further action.
(c) If the county attorney determines that there is a factual basis
for the report and that intervention by the mental health board is
necessary to protect the subject or others, the county attorney may file
a motion for reconsideration of the conditions set forth by the board and
have the matter set for hearing.
(d) The county attorney may apply for a warrant to take immediate
custody of the subject pending a rehearing by the board under subdivision
(c) of this subsection if the county attorney has reasonable cause to
believe that the subject poses a threat of danger to himself or herself
or others prior to such rehearing. The application for a warrant shall be
supported by affidavit or sworn testimony by the county attorney, a
mental health professional, or any other informed person. The application
for a warrant and the supporting affidavit may be filed with the board by
facsimile, but the original shall be filed with the board not later than
three days after the facsimile transmittal, excluding holidays and
weekends. Sworn testimony in support of the warrant application may be
taken over the telephone at the discretion of the board.
Sec. 11. Section 71-1221, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1221 (1) A mental health board shall be notified in writing of
the release by the treatment facility of any individual committed by the
mental health board. Such notice shall immediately be forwarded to the
county attorney. The county attorney shall file a copy with the court.
The mental health board shall, upon the motion of the county attorney, or
may upon its own motion, conduct a hearing to determine whether the
individual is a dangerous sex offender and consequently not a proper
subject for release. Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with
-14-

LB350 LB350
2025 2025
the procedures established for hearings under the Sex Offender Commitment
Act. The subject of such hearing shall be accorded all rights guaranteed
to the subject of a petition under the act.
(2) In the case of a subject who is domiciled in Indian country and
committed for treatment as provided in section 71-1226.01, the tribal
court shall be notified in writing of the release by the treatment
facility of any such subject committed by the tribal court.
Sec. 12. Original sections 71-931, 71-932, 71-933, 71-1215,
71-1216, and 71-1217, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
29-1823, 71-919, 71-937, 71-1204, and 71-1221, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-15-